Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3112
Programs, services, and duties transferred to Department of Health and Human Services.

Effective July 1, 2007, all programs, services, and duties of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure, and the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support shall be transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 3.